California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 4.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3731.

(a) When a tax deed to a purchaser of property sold by the tax collector pursuant to this part is recorded and it is determined that the property should not have been sold, the sale may be rescinded by the board of supervisors with the written consent of the county legal adviser and the purchaser of the property or a successor in interest in the property, except a bona fide purchaser for value, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The property has not been transferred or conveyed by the purchaser at the tax sale to a bona fide purchaser for value.

(2) The property has not become subject to a bona fide encumbrance for value subsequent to the recordation
 of the tax deed.

(b) If the written consent of the purchaser of the property or a successor in interest is not obtained pursuant to subdivision (a), the sale may be rescinded by the board of supervisors pursuant to the circumstances specified in subdivision (a), if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Notwithstanding Section 3731.1, a hearing is scheduled before the board of supervisors.

(2) (A) A notification is provided to the purchaser of the property or a successor in interest that contains all of the following information:

(i) The date, time, and place of the hearing.

(ii) A description of the property that was sold.

(iii) The reason for rescinding the sale of the property.

(iv) A statement that a refund will be issued to the purchaser of the property or the successor in interest, if applicable, for the purchase amount of the property plus interest at the county pool apportioned rate as specified in Section 5151 from the date of the purchase of the property.

(B) The tax collector shall send the notice, not less than 45 days prior to the date of the hearing, to the purchaser of the property or a successor in interest by certified mail with return receipt requested. The notice shall be sent to the last known mailing address of the purchaser of the property or a successor in interest.

(c) When the sale of tax-defaulted property is rescinded pursuant to this section, the
 purchaser or a successor in interest is entitled to a refund of the amount paid as the purchase price plus interest at the county pool apportioned rate as specified in Section 5151 from the date of the purchase of the property after rescission of the tax deed is recorded.

(d) The rescission shall be executed by the county tax collector and, if rescinded pursuant to subdivision (a), also by the purchaser or a successor in interest. The signature of both the county tax collector and the purchaser or a successor in interest shall be acknowledged by the county clerk, without charge, and the county tax collector shall then record the rescission with the county recorder, without charge. When the rescission is recorded, the tax deed becomes null and void as though never issued and all provisions of law relating to tax-defaulted property shall apply to the property.

(e) The holder of a
 tax certificate who received all or any part of the amount paid by the purchaser or a successor in interest shall not be obligated to make any refund or repayment of any amount to the purchaser, the delinquent taxpayer, the county, or any other person. The tax collector may use amounts on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund to make the refund, but only to the extent those amounts were paid to the holder of the applicable tax certificate.

(f) Subdivision (b) shall apply to sales that are completed on or after January 1, 2010.

(g) A proceeding may be commenced in a court pursuant to Section 3725 only if the person commencing the proceeding first petitions the board of supervisors to rescind the sale of a tax deed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 288, Sec. 3.   (AB 261)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3731.1.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by resolution, authorize any county officer to perform on its behalf any act required or authorized to be performed by the board of supervisors under Section 3731.

The resolution shall enumerate the section, or those portions of the section, to which the authorization is to apply, and shall specify administrative rules and procedures concerning any act performed under the authorization.

The resolution shall require that the county auditor record each act performed under the authorization. The resolution may provide for review by the board of supervisors of any act performed under the authorization, or for periodic reports to the board of supervisors of any or all acts performed under the authorization, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 34.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Deed to State, County or Public Agencies [3771. - 3841.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3771. - 3776.]

3771.

As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes assessments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3772.

As used in this chapter, “taxing agency” includes a county treasurer acting as trustee for a reclamation district and the “governing body” of a taxing agency includes such a county treasurer acting with the consent of the board of trustees of the reclamation district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3772.5.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Low-income persons” means persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined by Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit organization incorporated pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code for the purpose of acquisition of either of the following:

(1) Single-family or multifamily dwellings for rehabilitation and sale or rent to low-income persons, or for other use to serve low-income persons.

(2) Vacant land for construction of residential dwellings and subsequent sale or rent to low-income persons, for other use to serve low-income persons, or for dedication of that vacant land to public use.

(c) “Rehabilitation” means repairs and improvements to a substandard building, as defined in Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code, necessary to make it a building that is not a substandard building.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3773.

Whenever property becomes subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 for taxes, including taxes levied by a city or any taxing agency or for a revenue district the taxes of which are collected by county officers, the city or taxing agency or revenue district has all the rights under this chapter of a taxing agency to which property has been deeded for taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

3774.

The State has all the rights under this chapter of a taxing agency to which property has been deeded for taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

3775.

Whenever the county or the State is the purchaser the price shall be agreed upon between the county board of supervisors and the State Controller and the governing body of any city in which such property may be located and such price shall be paid to the county tax collector for distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

3776.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, no parcel for which a tax certificate has been sold and not canceled shall be sold or deeded to any taxing agency unless the taxing agency deposits into the applicable tax certificate redemption fund, held by the tax collector, the total amount required to be paid to the holder of the tax certificate pursuant to Section 4527.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Purchase from the State [3791. - 3813.]

3791.

Whenever property tax defaulted for five years or more, or three years or more in the case of nonresidential commercial property, as defined in Section 3691, in an applicable county, has been sold for taxes for two or more years or has been deeded for taxes to a taxing agency other than the state, the governing body of the taxing agency may, as provided in this article, make an agreement with the board of supervisors of the county in which the property is situated for the purchase of, or for an option to purchase, all or any of the tax-defaulted property or any part thereof including a right-of-way or other easement. When a part of a tax-defaulted parcel is sold the balance continues subject to redemption, if the right of redemption has not been terminated, and shall be separately valued for the purpose of redemption in the manner provided by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4131) of Part 7 of this division, except that no application need be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 944, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3791.3.

Whenever property has been tax defaulted for five years or more, or three years or more in the case of nonresidential commercial property, as defined in Section 3691, in an applicable county, whether or not the property is subject to or has been sold or deeded for taxes to a taxing agency other than the state, the state, county, any revenue district the taxes of which on the property are collected by county officers, or a redevelopment agency created pursuant to the California Community Redevelopment Law, may purchase the property or any part thereof, including any right-of-way or other easement, pursuant to this chapter. A redevelopment agency, however, may only purchase this tax-defaulted property located within a designated survey area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 944, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3791.4.

(a) When residential or vacant property has been tax defaulted for five years or more, or three years or more after the property has become tax defaulted and is subject to a nuisance abatement lien, that property may, with the approval of the board of supervisors of the county in which it is located, be purchased pursuant to this chapter by a nonprofit organization, provided that:

(1) In the case of residential property, the nonprofit organization shall rehabilitate and sell or rent to, or otherwise use the property to serve, low-income persons.

(2) In the case of vacant property, the nonprofit organization shall construct residential dwellings on the property
 and sell or rent the property to low-income persons, otherwise use the property to serve low-income persons, or dedicate the vacant property to public use.

(b) The terms and conditions of any conveyance to a nonprofit corporation pursuant to this section shall be specified in the deed or other instrument of conveyance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 17, Sec. 5.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3791.5.

Any agreement under this chapter may include a provision for payment to the county treasurer while the property is in public ownership and rented, leased, or sold on contract by the taxing agency of an amount agreed upon by the board of supervisors and the taxing agency in lieu of taxes on such property.

Any payment in lieu of taxes, required by an agreement under this chapter, shall be received by the county tax collector and shall be distributed among the county and revenue districts of the county in the same manner as provided for the distribution of taxes in Section 4656.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

3792.

If property tax defaulted for more than five years, or more than three years in the case of nonresidential commercial property, as defined in Section 3691, in an applicable county, has been sold for taxes for two or more years or has been deeded for taxes to two or more taxing agencies, they may make a joint agreement with the board of supervisors under this article. The joint agreement may provide for the conveyance of all or any interest in the property to one of them or to any combination of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 944, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3793.

Any agreement under this article may:

(a) Cover any tax-defaulted property without regard to the boundaries of the parcels which were assessed.

(b) Provide for sale of various portions of the property at various prices and on various terms and for an option to purchase any remaining portion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3793.1.

(a) The sales price of any property sold under this article shall include, at a minimum, the amounts of all of the following:

(1) All defaulted taxes and assessments, and all associated penalties and costs.

(2) Redemption penalties and fees incurred through the month of the sale.

(3) All costs of the sale.

(4) The outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan.

(b) If the property or property interests have been offered for sale under the provisions of
 Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3691) at least once and no acceptable bids therefor have been received, the tax collector may, in his or her discretion and with the approval of the board of supervisors, offer that property or those interests at a minimum price that the tax collector deems appropriate.

(c) The board of supervisors may permit a nonprofit organization to purchase property or property interests by way of installment payments.

(d) For purposes of this section, the “outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan” is the sum of the following:

(1) The tax payments made by the State Controller’s office on behalf of the claimant in the Property Tax Postponement Program.

(2) Accrued interest pursuant to Section 16183 of the
 Government Code, subject to Sections 20644 and 20644.5.

(3) Other associated fees and penalties as deemed appropriate by law.

(4) Less any payments already made on the property tax postponement loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 703, Sec. 24.   (AB 2231)   Effective September 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3794.

No option to purchase property under this article shall be given for longer than three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3794.3.

(a) A sale under this chapter shall take place only if approved by the board of supervisors.

(b) The board of supervisors shall not approve a sale under this chapter unless it conducts a hearing, with notice, and based upon substantial evidence in light of the whole record, makes either of the following findings:

(1) The sale price is greater than or equal to the tax sale value of the property.

(2) The tax sale value of the property is less than the amount necessary to redeem the property in accordance with Section 4102, such that there would be no excess proceeds from a sale under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section
 3691).

(c) Notice of the hearing required in subdivision (b) shall meet the following requirements:

(1) (A) The tax collector shall mail a copy of the notice at least 45 days prior to the hearing, by registered mail, to the last assessee of each portion of the property and to parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675, at their last known address.

(B) To ascertain the address of the last assessee of the property, an examination shall be made of the assessment of this property on the rolls beginning with the year of delinquency to, and including that of, the last equalized roll. The tax collector shall make reasonable efforts to ascertain the identity and address of parties of interest.

(C) It is not necessary to mail a copy of
 the notice to any party who files with the tax collector a written acknowledgment of receipt of a copy of the notice or a waiver of the notice. The validity of any sale under this chapter shall not be affected if the tax collector’s reasonable effort fails to disclose the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest or if a party of interest does not receive mailed notice.

(2) The notice shall include all of the following:

(A) A description of the property substantially as described in the agreement.

(B) The name of the last assessee of the property. To ascertain the name of the last assessee of the tax-defaulted property an examination shall be made of the assessment of this property on the last equalized roll, or if this property does not appear thereon, the last previous roll on which it was
 assessed.

(C) A statement that an agreement for the sale of the property or for an option to purchase it, or both, as applicable, has been proposed with the taxing agency or nonprofit organization named in the agreement.

(D) The proposed sale price of the property.

(E) The date, time, and location of the hearing set forth in subdivision (b).

(F) A statement informing the parties of their rights to appear and present evidence under subdivision (d), and that the sale will not take place unless the board of supervisors makes one of the findings set forth in subdivision (b).

(G) A statement in substantially the following form:

“If you challenge the
 proposed sale in court, you may be limited to raising only those issues you or someone else raised at the hearing described in this notice, or in written correspondence delivered to the county at, or prior to, the hearing.”

(d) The assessee and all parties of interest shall each have the right to appear at the hearing and to present any relevant evidence regarding the value of the property or the existence or amount of excess proceeds to which they may be entitled under Section 3797. That evidence may be presented to the board of supervisors at the hearing or in writing any time prior to the hearing. Any evidence presented will become part of the record considered by the board of supervisors under subdivision (b).

(e) Any costs incurred in conducting the hearing and making the findings set forth in this section shall be paid by the taxing agency or nonprofit organization by which
 the property is to be or may be purchased.

(f) Any determination made by the board of supervisors under subdivision (b) may be challenged by filing a petition for judicial review in the superior court of the county within 45 days following the issuance of the decision by the board. The petition shall name the county as a respondent and shall clearly state the grounds upon which the petitioner alleges the determination is unlawful or unsupported by substantial evidence.

(g) Judicial review under subdivision (f) shall be conducted pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The court shall review the administrative record of the hearing before the board of supervisors to determine whether the board’s decision is supported by substantial evidence in the administrative record. No new
 evidence shall be introduced in the judicial review proceeding, except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) Notice of the right to judicial review and the applicable deadlines shall be included in the written notice of the board’s determination provided to all parties who appeared at the hearing or submitted written evidence.

(i) If the superior court determines that the decision of the board of supervisors was not supported by substantial evidence or that the board otherwise failed to follow the requirements of this chapter, the court may vacate the decision and remand the matter to the board of supervisors for further proceedings consistent with the court’s determination.

(j) For purposes of this section, “tax sale value” means the amount that typically could be realized from the sale of the property at a properly advertised and conducted public auction under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3691).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (AB 418)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3795.

The agreement shall be submitted to the Controller. If he or she does not approve the agreement, he or she shall return the agreement to each party with a statement of his or her objections to it, and thereafter a new or modified agreement may be made. If the Controller approves the agreement, he or she shall sign the executed copy, return the signed agreement to the tax collector, and keep a copy on file in his or her office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 606, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3795.5.

In the case of an agreement involving a nonprofit organization, the board of supervisors may establish conditions of sale, including reporting, to assure the completion of rehabilitation within a reasonable time and maximum benefit to low-income persons. These conditions shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring compliance with a jurisdiction’s consolidated plan or a community development plan.

(b) Articles of incorporation filed with the Secretary of State, stating that the organization is incorporated for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3772.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3796.

By written authorization, the Controller shall then direct the county tax collector to cause notice of the agreement to be given.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3797.

The notice of agreement shall state:

(a) A description of the property substantially as described in the agreement. 

(b) The name of the last assessee of the property. To ascertain the name of the last assessee of the tax-defaulted property an examination shall be made of the assessment of this property on the last equalized roll, or if this property does not appear thereon, the last previous roll on which it was assessed.

(c) That an agreement for the sale of the property or for an option to purchase it, or both, as the case may be, has been made by the board of supervisors of the county with the taxing agency or nonprofit organization named in the agreement and has been approved by the Controller.

(d) That a copy of the agreement is on file in the office of the board of supervisors.

(e) If the right to redeem the property has not already been terminated, there shall also be a statement that unless the property is redeemed before the agreement becomes effective, the right of redemption will cease.

(f) The date and time that the agreement will become effective.

(g) That parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675, have the right to file a claim with the county for any proceeds received by the tax collector under the agreement which are in excess of the liens and costs required to be paid from the proceeds.

(h) If excess proceeds result from the agreement, notice will be given to parties of interest pursuant to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 988, Sec. 66.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3798.

The notice of agreement shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, or, if none, then by posting copies of the notice in three public places in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3798.1.

If in the judgment of the board of supervisors any property to be sold under this chapter would bring at auction less than the cost of publication in a newspaper, the publication may be made in the same manner as if there were no newspaper published in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

3799.

The tax collector shall mail a copy of the notice not less than 45 nor more than 60 days prior to the effective date of the agreement, by registered mail to the last assessee of each portion of the property and to parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675, at their last known address.

To ascertain the address of the last assessee of the property an examination shall be made of the assessment of this property on the rolls beginning with the year of delinquency to and including that of the last equalized roll. The tax collector shall make reasonable efforts to ascertain the identity and address of parties of interest.

It is not necessary to mail a copy of the notice to any party who files with the tax collector a written acknowledgment of receipt of a copy of the notice or a waiver of the notice. The validity of any sale under this chapter shall not be affected if the tax collector’s reasonable effort fails to disclose the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest or if a party of interest does not receive mailed notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

3800.

The cost of giving the notice of agreement shall be paid by the taxing agency or nonprofit organization by which the property is to be or may be purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

3801.

An affidavit showing that the notice of agreement has been given as prescribed shall be filed in the office of the county tax collector.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3802.

The agreement shall become effective no sooner than 5:01 p.m. on the 21st day after the first publication of the notice of agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

3803.

If not previously terminated, all rights to redeem the property shall terminate on the date and at the time the agreement becomes effective. If all or any portion of the property is redeemed before the agreement becomes effective, the agreement is null as to the property redeemed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

3804.

(a) If any portion of the property is not so redeemed, the tax collector shall, without charge, execute to the purchaser a deed of the property as to which either:

(1) The agreement provides that no payment is to be made by the purchaser, or

(2) There has been paid the purchase price in compliance with the terms of the agreement.

(b) The tax collector shall promptly deliver the deed described in subdivision (a) to the county recorder for recordation and shall send a conformed copy of that deed to the Controller. The recorder shall record the deed and prepare necessary conformed copies without charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3804.2.

If a deed to the purchaser contains a clerical error or misstatement of fact, a corrected deed shall be issued by the tax collector and recorded with the county recorder without charge. The new deed shall contain a statement of reasons for its issuance and, as far as practical, shall be the same as the original except where corrected. The tax collector shall send a conformed copy of the new deed to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3805.

In addition to the usual provisions of a deed conveying real property, the deed shall specify:

(a) That the real property was subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 for nonpayment of taxes which had been legally levied and were a lien on the property.

(b) The name of the purchaser.

(c) Any condition deemed necessary to effect compliance with the agreement, including, but not limited to, a condition that the real property be used by the taxing agency or nonprofit organization for the public use specified in the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

3806.

Except as against actual fraud, the deed is conclusive evidence of compliance with this article and otherwise has the same effect as evidence and as a conveyance as a deed to a private purchaser after sale of tax-deeded property under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3691) of this part. When the property is sold under an agreement providing for the resale of the property by the purchasing agent the deed given upon resale shall have the same effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

3808.

Any payment required by an agreement under this chapter shall be made to the county tax collector and, except as provided for in Section 3791.5, shall be deposited, like tax collections, in the delinquent tax sale trust fund and shall be distributed under Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671) of Part 8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 28.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

3809.

A proceeding based on alleged invalidity or irregularity of any agreement or deed executed under this article can only be commenced within one year after the execution of the instrument.

Sections 351 to 358, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure do not apply to the time within which a proceeding may be brought under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 830, Sec. 18.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

3810.

A defense or cross-complaint based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any agreement or deed executed under this article can only be maintained in a proceeding commenced within a year after the execution of the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

3811.

On execution of the deed to the taxing agency or nonprofit organization, the tax collector shall report the following to the Controller, the assessor, and the auditor:

(a) The name of the purchaser.

(b) The effective date of the sale and the date of the transfer of the deed to the taxing agency or nonprofit organization.

(c) The amount for which the property was sold.

(d) The description of the property conveyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3813.

The tax collector shall note the fact and date of a sale under this chapter on the margin of each delinquent and current roll on which the property appears, opposite the property sold. Any charges against the collector having custody of the delinquent and current rolls shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sales Between Taxing Agencies [3841. - 3841.]

3841.

If any property, whether subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 or not, is deeded for taxes to two or more taxing agencies, any one or more of them may sell and convey its or their interest in all or any portion of the property to any one or more of them for any agreed price and terms. Any one of them may, by itself or with another taxing agency, make the purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Rights of Purchaser of Tax-Deeded Property, or Any Other Person Claiming Through Him, to Bring Action to Determine Adverse Claims to or Clouds Upon Tax-Deeded Property Purchased From the State [3950. - 3972.]

3950.

Whenever tax-defaulted property has been purchased at tax sale, including purchases made under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771), and all subsequent taxes levied and payable have been paid, the purchaser, or any person claiming through the purchaser, may bring an action to determine adverse claims to or clouds upon that property. The complaint shall be verified and shall aver the matters above enumerated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

3951.

The complaint shall include as defendants to the action, all persons who are known to plaintiff or who appear of record to have some interest in or claim or cloud on the land described in plaintiff’s complaint, arising prior to the date of the tax deed, other than persons owning a special assessment unless plaintiff seeks to determine the interest or claim of those persons. The state may be made a party defendant where the property was sold prior to September 10, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

3952.

The complaint may further include as defendants persons unknown to plaintiff who claim any right, interest, lien, or claim on the land or cloud upon the title of plaintiff thereto arising prior to the date of the tax deed. In any case in which any person who appears to have had an interest in the land or any claim or cloud upon the title of the plaintiff thereto is known to be dead, the heirs and devisees of that person may be sued as “the heirs and devisees” of the person, naming him or her, or if the person is believed to be dead and that belief is alleged in the complaint on information and belief then the heirs and devisees of that person may also be sued as “the heirs and devisees” of that person, naming him or her, provided that the person is also named as a defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

3953.

All unknown defendants, except unknown defendants owning a special assessment, shall be described in the complaint, as follows: “Also all other persons unknown, claiming any right, title, estate, lien or interest in the real property described in the complaint, adverse to plaintiff’s ownership or any cloud upon plaintiff’s title thereto.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3954.

Unknown defendants owning or claiming an interest in a special assessment shall be described in the complaint, as follows: “The owner or any person claiming an interest in a special assessment lien (here describe said lien as it is described in the bond or assessment records of the district in which it was issued).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3955.

Whenever unknown defendants owning or claiming an interest in special assessments are made parties defendant, the following persons shall also be made parties defendant: (a) The payee, as shown by the bond representing the special assessment, if any; (b) the owner of the special assessment, or any person claiming an interest therein, as shown by the treasurer’s records; and (c) the treasurer, as collecting agent and trustee of the funds collected for unknown owners of a special assessment or persons claiming an interest therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3956.

Within 10 days after the filing of the complaint, plaintiff shall file or cause to be filed in the office of the county recorder of the county where the property is situated, a notice of the pendency of the action, containing the matters required by Section 409 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3957.

Any summons that is issued shall contain the matters required by Section 412.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and in addition, a description of the property and a statement of the object of the action. In the summons, the unknown defendants shall be designated as they are in the complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

3958.

Within 30 days after the issuance of the summons, the plaintiff shall post, or cause to be posted, a copy thereof in a conspicuous place on the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3959.

All known defendants shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

3960.

All unknown defendants shall be served by publication as provided for in Section 415.50 of the Code of Civil Procedure, but it must appear by affidavit that the plaintiff used reasonable diligence to ascertain the identity of the unknown defendants and to ascertain the identity of any persons sued as heirs and devisees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

3961.

All unknown defendants served by publication shall have the same rights as are provided by law for other defendants upon whom personal service or service by publication is made. The action shall proceed against the unknown defendants in the same manner as against the other defendants who are served personally or by publication. Regardless of any legal disability, any unknown defendant, who has been served, and anyone claiming under him, who has or claims to have any right, title, estate, lien or interest in the property, or cloud upon the title thereto, or who owns or claims to own an interest in a special assessment lien adverse to plaintiff at the time of the commencement of the action, shall be concluded by a judgment in the action as if the action were brought against and personal service made upon that person by his or her name. Service shall be deemed complete upon the completion of the publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3962.

No decree quieting title or establishing the rights of any of the defendants as to the property shall be granted on default of the defendant, unless the court requires proof of the facts alleged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3963.

On the trial of the action, the court shall determine the rights of all the parties thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

3964.

If the court determines that any of the defendants have any right, title, interest, lien or estate in or to the parcel of property involved, the court shall render its decree establishing these rights and may order the sale of the property or the partition thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------

3965.

If the court orders a sale of the property or a partition thereof, the same shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Title 10.5 (commencing with Section 872.010) of Part 2, of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that proceeds of sale belonging to unknown special assessment owners, or persons claiming an interest in said special assessments, shall be paid to the treasurer, to be held by him as in like instances of collections by said treasurer of special assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

3966.
